California statutes. Public Utilities Code
From and after the date of filing of the resolution with the secretary of the district the annexation of the territory, or portion thereof, to the special transit service district is complete; provided, that if pursuant to Sections 27463 and 27464 of this article, an annexation election is to be held, the annexation is stayed until the canvassing of the results of said election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27471.

From and after the date of annexation any territory annexed to a special transit service district is liable for payment of its proportionate share of any indebtedness then existing and payable by the special transit service district. From and after the date of annexation the board shall levy upon all of the property in the territory annexed such taxes, tolls, or charges as are necessary to comply with the terms and conditions of annexation, in addition to any other district taxes otherwise authorized in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27472.

Upon the completion of the annexation of any territory in accordance with law to any city included, or partially included, in a special transit service district, the city clerk shall file with the secretary of the district a certified copy of the ordinance, resolution or other document completing said annexation, containing a description of the territory so annexed. Unless the district within 90 days after such filing shall file with the city clerk the district’s written objections to the annexation to the special transit service district of said territory or portion thereof, such territory, or portion thereof, shall, upon the termination of such period be deemed
 incorporated into and annexed to the special transit service district, and thereafter is subject to taxation, along with the entire territory of the special transit service district in accordance with the assessable valuation of the property thereof, for special transit service district purposes, and for the payment of any indebtedness theretofore or thereafter incurred by the special transit service district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 744.)
-------------------------------------------

27473.

If the district shall file its objections in the manner aforesaid to the annexation to a special transit service district of such territory or portion thereof, the territory, or portion thereof, shall not be annexed to the special transit service district except in the manner provided in Article 6 (commencing with Section 27461) of this chapter. The district may withdraw such objections by filing with the city clerk a certified copy of a resolution of the board stating that such objections are withdrawn. Thereupon such territory, or portion thereof, shall be deemed incorporated into and annexed to the special transit service district as provided in Section
 27472.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 744.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Dissolution [27481. - 27481.]

27481.

A special transit service district may be dissolved by resolution of the board if any proposition for the incurring of a bonded indebtedness fails to carry, and if the special transit service district is then subject to no other indebtedness or liability pursuant to this part and has been organized for not less than two years. Dissolution of a special transit service district shall not prevent subsequent proceedings for the creation of a special transit service district including the same or any part of the area of the special transit service district dissolved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Dissolution [27501. - 27509.]

27501.

The board of any district which operates no transit facilities, or with exterior boundaries coincident with the boundaries of a single city, may call an election at any time for the purpose of submitting to the voters of the district the question of whether the district will be dissolved. Upon the filing with the secretary of such a district of a petition signed by voters within the district equal in number to at least 25 percent of the total vote cast, asking that the question of dissolution of the district be submitted to the voters of the district, the board shall call such an election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

27502.

The election for the purpose of submitting to the voters of the district the question of whether or not the district shall be dissolved shall be held on the next established election date not less than 74 days next succeeding the date on which the petition is filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1146.)
-------------------------------------------

27503.

Notice of any election for dissolution, whether called because of the filing of a petition or ordered by the board without petition, shall be published. The date fixed for the election shall not be less than 30 days from the date of the first publication of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

27504.

The ballots for the election shall contain substantially the instructions required to be printed on ballots for use at general state and county elections and in addition the following: Shall the “(giving the name thereof) transit district” be dissolved?YESNO

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

27505.

No other notice of the election other than that provided for in this chapter need be given and no sample ballots need be sent to the voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

27506.

If upon a canvass of the election it is found that a majority of all votes cast on the proposition at the election were in favor of the dissolution, the dissolution shall be deemed carried and approved by the voters. The board shall meet on Monday next succeeding the election and canvass the votes cast.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

27507.

Upon dissolution of any district which has boundaries that are coincident with the corporate limits of a city, the district property wherever situated vests absolutely in the city, and upon the dissolution of any district operating no transit facilities and which has boundaries that extend beyond the boundaries of a single city the property of the district wherever situated vests in the county in which the whole or greater portion of the district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

27508.

If at the time of dissolution there is any outstanding indebtedness of the district the legislative authority of the city, where the limits of the district lie wholly within the corporate limits of a city, and in all other cases the board of supervisors of the county in which the whole or greater portion of the district is situated are ex officio the board of directors of the district for the purpose only of the levy and collection of taxes for the payment of the indebtedness of the district existing at the time of dissolution and the interest thereon. The board or legislative authority shall levy the taxes and perform such other acts as are necessary to raise the money
 necessary for the payment of the indebtedness and the interest thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

27509.

In the event that the proposition for dissolution fails to carry, no subsequent election for the dissolution of the district shall be called until after the expiration of one year from the date of the prior election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. SAN FRANCISCO BAY AREA RAPID TRANSIT DISTRICT [28500. - 29757.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [28500. - 28509.]

28500.

This part is known and may be cited as the “San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28501.

This part is in furtherance of the declared policy of the State to stimulate the maximum use of the harbor in San Francisco Bay in order to foster and develop international and other trade for the benefit of the entire State.

The geographical situation of San Francisco Bay, which makes it one of the finest harbors in the world, at the same time prevents the full utilization of the harbor by acting as a physical barrier to a system of rapid and effective transportation between the various portions of the metropolitan area surrounding the Bay.

Only a specially created district can freely
 operate in the eighty-four (84) individual units of county, city and county, and city governments located in this area. Because of the unique problems presented by the area it is necessary that this legislation be applicable solely to such area to insure necessary rapid transit service.

Extensive studies and surveys have been made at considerable cost in public funds to determine whether or not interurban mass rapid transit would be a feasible instrument for reducing existing and future interurban travel problems and for relieving existing and future traffic congestion on freeways, streets and highways. These surveys have produced convincing evidence that the prosperity of the entire Bay area will depend upon the preservation and enhancement of its urban centers and subcenters; and that sustaining these centers and subcenters as concentrations of employment, commerce, and culture, in turn will depend upon providing an adequate, modern, interurban mass rapid transit
 system.

The studies have also established that to provide a standard of service which will meet the needs of the public, the interurban system must be effectively separated from conflicting traffic either by grade separation of intersecting streets, roads, and highways, or by other equally effective means; and, to the extent practicable, its service must be coordinated with that of other transit facilities in the areas served.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28502.

The part shall be liberally construed to carry out the objects and purposes and the declared policy of the State of California as in this part set forth.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28502.1.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28503.

“District” as used in this part, means the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28504.

“San Francisco Bay area,” as used in this part, means the Counties of San Francisco, Marin, Sonoma, Napa, Solano, Contra Costa, Alameda, Santa Clara and San Mateo.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28505.

“Rapid transit,” as used in this part, means the transportation of passengers and their incidental baggage by any means.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28506.

For the purpose of establishing the bonded debt limit of the district, “taxable property,” as used in this part, shall not include solvent credits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28507.

“Board of supervisors,” as used in this part, means the board of supervisors of a county in the San Francisco Bay area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28508.

“Board of directors,” “board,” or “directors,” as used in this part, means the board of directors of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28509.

“Public agency,” as used in this part, includes the State of California, and any county, city and county, city, district, or other political subdivision or public entity of, or organized under the laws of, this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Creation of District [28600. - 28602.]

28600.

There is hereby created the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District, comprising the territory lying within the boundaries of the Counties of Alameda, Contra Costa, Marin, San Francisco, and San Mateo.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28601.

Through compliance with the provisions for withdrawal set forth in Chapter 10 of this part, the territory of any of the Counties of Alameda, Contra Costa, Marin, San Francisco, and San Mateo may be withdrawn from the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28602.

Through compliance with the provisions for annexation set forth in Chapter 9 of this part, the territory of all or any of the Counties of Napa, Santa Clara, Solano, or Sonoma may be included within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Government of District [28745. - 28845.]



  ARTICLE 2.2. District Board of Directors [28745. - 28748.8.]

28745.

On and after November 29, 1974, the governing body of the district shall be a board of directors consisting of nine members elected by election districts, except as provided in Section 28752.6.

The nine election districts shall be established within the district as provided in this article by resolution adopted by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 521.)
-------------------------------------------

28745.4.

The board, in dividing the district into election districts, shall establish and define the boundaries of the nine election districts within the territory of the district, and shall number the election districts from 1 to 9, inclusive. The boundaries of the election districts shall be defined so that the districts shall be as nearly equal in population as practicable, considering the factors specified in Section 28745.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 184.)
-------------------------------------------

28745.6.

In establishing the election districts, consideration shall be given to the following factors:

(a) Community of interest of the population within an election district.

(b) Cohesiveness, contiguity, integrity, and compactness of territory.

(c) Topography.

(d) Geography.

Boundaries of the election districts need not conform to the boundaries of counties, cities, cities and
 counties, or districts, or of wards or election districts established for the nomination or election of any officers thereof, or of Assembly, Senate, or congressional districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 521.)
-------------------------------------------

28745.8.

The establishment of election districts shall be made on the basis of the population in the district as shown or estimated from the most recent of any of the following: the last federal decennial census; any census of a county, taken as provided in Section 26203 of the Government Code, or census of a city, taken as provided in Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 40200), Part 2, Division 3, Title 4 of the Government Code; any census or population estimate of a city or of a city and county, taken or made as provided in Section 2107.1 or 2107.2 of the Streets and Highways Code; or population estimates contained in any official document prepared by the Department of Finance
 and issued to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 521.)
-------------------------------------------

28746.

The resolution establishing the election districts shall describe the boundaries of the election districts by reference to a map or maps on file with the district secretary. Immediately upon adoption of the resolution, the secretary shall file a certified copy of the map or maps describing all nine election districts with the Secretary of State and with the county elections official of each county with territory within the boundaries of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 99.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

28746.2.

All cities, counties, and cities and counties within the district shall provide such information, services, and facilities as may be required in apportioning the district into the nine election districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 184.)
-------------------------------------------

28746.4.

Until the election and qualification of the first elected board, the members of the board in office on January 1, 1974, shall remain in office, shall receive the compensation and expenses prescribed in this part for the office, and shall be the governing body of the district. The term of office of the nonelected board shall end at noon on November 29, 1974.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 521.)
-------------------------------------------

28746.6.

A general district election for the election of directors whose terms are to expire in that year shall be held and conducted on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each even-numbered year and shall be consolidated, where possible, with the general election held on that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 248, Sec. 212.)
-------------------------------------------

28746.8.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, candidates for the board shall be nominated, the election held and conducted, and the ballots canvassed in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform District Election Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 521.)
-------------------------------------------

28747.

Each candidate for the board shall file a declaration of candidacy in the form and manner prescribed in the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code) with the county elections official of the county in which the candidate resides. Candidates for the board shall be residents and voters of the district and of the geographical area making up the election district from which they are to be elected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 100.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

28747.2.

A candidate for election from any of the election districts shall be nominated and elected by the voters residing within the election district from which he is elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 521.)
-------------------------------------------

28747.4.

The county elections official of each county within the boundaries of the district shall conduct the election and canvass the returns for those election districts or portions of election districts which are within the county of his or her jurisdiction as county elections official. After the official canvass has been taken, the county elections official shall report the returns, by election district number, to the board. The board shall declare the results of the election. The secretary of the district shall issue certificates of election, signed by him or
 her and duly authenticated, to each candidate declared elected, immediately following determination of the results of the election by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 101.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

28747.6.

Members of the board shall be residents and voters of the district and of the geographical area making up the election district from which they are elected. The office shall be deemed to be vacant if a member ceases to meet these requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 521.)
-------------------------------------------

28747.8.

The candidate from each election district receiving the highest number of votes cast for the board in that election district shall be declared elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 521.)
-------------------------------------------

28748.

If a tie vote makes it impossible to determine which of two or more candidates has been elected, the existing board shall resolve the tie by lot and declare the results thereof as provided in Section 10551 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 194.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

28748.2.

Each member of the first elected board shall take office at noon on November 29, 1974. The term of office of the elected directors shall be four years, except that the term of office of the first elected board shall be either two years or four years. At the first regular meeting of the first elected board, the board shall determine, by lot, whether the directors elected from the even- or odd-numbered election districts shall have terms of office expiring at noon on the last Friday in November 1976 or November 1978, as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 521.)
-------------------------------------------

28748.4.

Until November 29, 1974, any vacancy on the board shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term in the same manner as the vacating member was appointed. Thereafter, any vacancy on the board shall be filled by appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term by the remaining members of the board. Any person so appointed shall meet the requirements set forth in Section 28747.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 521.)
-------------------------------------------

28748.8.

(a) The board may by ordinance or resolution provide that each director shall be paid a sum that shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each calendar month that he or she serves as a director. The board may, by ordinance or resolution, provide for an adjustment to the monthly compensation based upon the percentage increase in the California Consumer Price Index, as calculated by the Department of Finance, for each calendar year following the operative date of the last adjustment. The adjustment shall not become effective
 until the next regular election of the directors following the adoption of the ordinance or resolution.

(b) The ordinance or resolution to authorize a monthly stipend pursuant to subdivision (a), in lieu of per-meeting compensation, shall include a requirement that a member can receive a monthly stipend for a given month only if he or she attends all scheduled and noticed regular board meetings for that month. For those members meeting this attendance requirement, the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) shall be deducted from the stipend for failure to attend each meeting of a committee on which he or she serves that month. In any month that a member fails to meet these attendance requirements, that member may be compensated at the rate of one hundred dollars ($100) per board or committee meeting attended, not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for that month.

(c) For the
 purpose of this section, a member who misses a scheduled and noticed meeting of the board or a committee while attending to official district business pursuant to authorization shall be construed as having attended the meeting.

(d) The ordinance or resolution may provide for not more than two excused absences during a calendar year without disqualifying the member for a monthly stipend.

(e) In addition to the compensation otherwise provided for in this section, each director may be allowed necessary traveling and personal expenses incurred solely as a result of the performance of his or her duties, in amounts as may be authorized by the board. Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 213, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.4. Redistricting of Election Districts [28750. - 28750.8.]

28750.

Following each federal decennial census and using the census as a basis, the board shall, by resolution, adjust the boundaries of the election districts so that the districts shall be as nearly equal in population as practicable, considering the factors specified in Section 28745.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

28750.2.

The boundaries of the election districts shall be adjusted by the board before November 1 of the year next succeeding the year in which each federal decennial census is taken.

Notwithstanding Section 28745, if the board fails to adjust election district boundaries pursuant to this article before the December 31 of the year next succeeding the year in which each federal decennial census is taken, each director to be elected at that election shall have the qualifications required in Section 28747.6, but shall be elected at large. Directors shall continue to be so elected until the
 board adjusts the election district boundaries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 272, Sec. 1.   Effective August 25, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

28750.4.

The resolution reestablishing the election districts shall describe the new boundaries of the election districts by reference to a map or maps on file with the secretary of the district. Immediately upon adoption of the resolution, the secretary shall file a certified copy of the resolution and the map or maps describing all election districts with the Secretary of State and with the county elections official of each county with territory within the boundaries of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 102.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

28750.6.

If, at any time between each federal decennial census, the district annexes territory, pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 29500), the board, within 90 days after completion of the annexation proceedings, shall, by resolution, adjust the boundaries of the election districts so that the district shall be as nearly equal in population as practicable, considering the factors specified in Section 28745.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

28750.8.

(a) The term of office of any director who has been elected and whose term of office has not expired shall not be affected by any change in the boundaries of the election district from which he was elected.

(b) At the first election for directors following adjustment of the boundaries of the election districts, a director shall be elected for each election district under the readjusted election district plan that has the same number as an election district whose incumbent’s term is due to expire.

(c) Notwithstanding any
 other provision of this article, a change in the boundaries of an election district shall not be made within 90 days prior to the final date of voter registration for an election of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 521.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.6. Board Selection Election [28752. - 28752.8.]

28752.

Not later than January 31, 1974, the board of supervisors of any county included within the district may adopt a resolution declaring that, in its judgment, the members of the board of directors should be appointed as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 28730), rather than elected as provided in Article 2.2 (commencing with Section 28745).

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 521.)
-------------------------------------------

28752.2.

(a) If the boards of supervisors of two or more counties included within the district adopt resolutions pursuant to Section 28752, the board of directors shall call a special election which shall be consolidated with the direct primary election to be held on June 4, 1974.

(b) The board of directors shall provide for the publication of notice of the election pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code. The first publication of notice shall be made between May 1 and May 15, 1974.

(c) The ballot for the election shall
 contain substantially the instructions required to be printed on ballots for use at general elections and the following proposition substantially as follows:Shall the members of the Board of Directors of the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District be elected?YESNO

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 521.)
-------------------------------------------

28752.4.

If a majority of the votes cast in the district on the proposition are in favor of the proposition, the members of the board of directors from that county shall be elected and shall serve as provided in Article 2.2 (commencing with Section 28745).

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 521.)
-------------------------------------------

28752.6.

If a majority of the votes cast in the district on the proposition are not in favor of the proposition, the members of the board of directors shall be appointed and shall serve as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 28730).

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 521.)
-------------------------------------------

28752.8.

The results of the election shall be entered into the minutes of the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 521.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Powers and Duties of Directors [28760. - 28774.]

28760.

Each director, before entering upon the duties of his office, shall take the oath of office as provided for in the Constitution and laws of this State. A copy of the oath shall be filed with the secretary of the district and the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28761.

The board shall choose one of its members president, and another vice president, who shall be authorized to act for the president during his absence or disability. The board shall choose a secretary, who shall not be a member of the board, and shall provide for the time and place of holding its meetings which shall be held at least once each month. The president shall be paid a salary of five thousand dollars ($5,000) per year. The vice president shall be paid a salary of three thousand dollars ($3,000) per year. Such salaries shall be in addition to any payments authorized under Section 28748.8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 601.)
-------------------------------------------

28762.

The board of directors is the legislative body of the district and, consistent with the provisions of this part, shall determine all questions of district policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28763.

The district may do any and all things necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28764.

The board shall determine what transit facilities should be acquired or constructed, and may establish zones within the district to undertake the acquisition or construction of any transit facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28765.

The board may determine what transit facilities should be acquired or constructed:

(a) For the common benefit of the district as a whole; or

(b) For the benefit of two or more zones; or

(c) For the benefit of a single zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28766.

The board shall supervise and regulate every transit facility owned and operated by the district, including the fixing of rates, rentals, charges, and classifications, and the making and enforcement of rules, regulations, contracts, practices, and schedules, for or in connection with any transit facility owned or controlled by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28767.

The board may adopt a personnel system for the purpose of recruiting and maintaining an effective working force with good morale. The board shall by resolution determine and create such number and character of positions as are necessary properly to carry on the functions of the district and shall establish an appropriate salary, salary range, or wage for each position so created. The board may by resolution abolish any such position. Except as otherwise provided, appointments to such positions shall be made by the general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28767.3.

Not later than October 12, 1974, the board shall adopt an affirmative action program approved by the Office of Federal Contract Compliance of the Department of Labor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 199.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

28767.5.

The district is authorized to maintain a police department. The employees of the district that are appointed as members of such department by the general manager and duly sworn are peace officers; provided, that such officers shall not exercise their powers or authority except as provided in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code. The district shall adhere to the standards for recruitment and training of peace officers established by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training pursuant to Title 4 (commencing with Section 13500) of Part 4 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 420.)
-------------------------------------------

28767.8.

(a) The board may establish an office of independent police auditor, reporting directly to the board, to investigate complaints against district police personnel.

(b) The appointed independent police auditor shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) To investigate those complaints or allegations of on-duty misconduct and
 off-duty unlawful activity by district police personnel, within the independent police auditor’s purview as it is set by the board.

(2) To reach independent findings as to the validity of each complaint.

(3) To recommend appropriate disciplinary action against district police personnel for those complaints determined to be sustained.

(c) The board shall organize, reorganize, and manage the office of the independent police auditor. Notwithstanding the authority granted the general manager in this part, the board may, by resolution, authorize a citizen review board to participate in recommending appropriate disciplinary action.

(d) The independent police auditor shall prepare, in accordance with the rules of the office, reports of his or her activities as
 permitted by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 78, Sec. 2.   (AB 1586)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

28768.

The board of directors may contract for or employ any professional services required by the district or for the performance of work or services for the district which, in the board of director’s opinion, cannot satisfactorily be performed by the officers or employees of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28769.

The board shall have an annual audit made of all books and accounts of the district by an independent certified public accountant or public accountant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28769.5.

The board shall operate an automated management information system to enable it to submit a report monthly to the Metropolitan Transportation Commission and the office of the Legislative Analyst on the district’s expenditures as compared to the projected expenditures in its budget, and the board shall submit such report to the commission and that office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1204.)
-------------------------------------------

28770.

As soon as practicable after the close of each fiscal year the board of directors shall submit to the chief administrative officer and legislative bodies of cities and counties within the district a financial report showing the result of operations during the preceding fiscal year and the financial status of the district on the final day thereof. Copies of the report shall be supplied to the general public upon request in the quantity deemed appropriate by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28771.

The board may provide by resolution, under such terms and conditions as it sees fit, for the payment of demands against the district without prior specific approval thereof by the board if the demand is for a purpose for which an expenditure has been previously approved by the board and in an amount no greater than the amount so authorized, and if the demand is approved by the general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28772.

To facilitate the business of the district, the board may provide for the creation and administration of such funds as the needs of the district may require. The funds shall be disbursed in accordance with rules established by the board and all payments from any fund shall be reported to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28773.

The board of directors may hold public hearings, subpoena witnesses, and perform all other acts necessary to properly carry out its duties. The board may delegate such authority to other officers of the district who shall report thereon to the board. In the case of public hearings, including those pursuant to Sections 29039 to 29046, inclusive, authority may be so delegated to a referee, who need not be an officer of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 311.)
-------------------------------------------

28774.

Each director may administer oaths and affirmations in any district investigation or proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Meetings and Legislation [28790. - 28796.]

28790.

All meetings of the board of directors, whether regular or special, shall be open to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28791.

A majority of the board of directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of its business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28792.

The board of directors shall adopt rules to govern its proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

28793.

The acts of the board shall be expressed by motion, resolution, or ordinance. No ordinance shall be passed by the board on the day of its introduction, nor within three days thereafter, nor at any time other than a special, regular, or adjourned regular meeting. No ordinance, resolution, or motion shall have any validity or effect unless passed by the affirmative votes of a majority of the directors. No ordinance shall take effect until the expiration of 30 days following its adoption, except the following which shall take effect upon adoption: an ordinance relating to an election, or to the issuance or sale of bonds, or to the levying or collection of taxes, or the